Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2363.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 33-1901, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE33-1901. Definitions In this article, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Managing agent" means a person, corporation, partnership or limited liability company that is authorized by the owner to operate and manage the property. 2. "Residential rental property" means property that is used solely as leased or rented property for residential purposes or that is rented to lodgers for periods of less than THIRTY days. If the property is a space rental mobile home park, residential rental property includes the rental space that is leased or rented by the owner of that rental space but does not include the mobile home or recreational vehicle that serves as the actual dwelling if the dwelling is owned and occupied by the tenant of the rental space and not by the owner of the rental space. 3. "Slum property" means residential rental property that has deteriorated or is in a state of disrepair and that manifests one or more of the following conditions that are a danger to the health or safety of the public: (a) Structurally unsound exterior surfaces, roof, walls, doors, floors, stairwells, porches or railings. (b) Lack of potable water, adequate sanitation facilities, adequate water or waste pipe connections. (c) Hazardous electrical systems or gas connections. (d) Lack of safe, rapid egress. (e) Accumulation of human or animal waste, medical or biological waste, gaseous or combustible materials, dangerous or corrosive liquids, flammable or explosive materials or drug paraphernalia. END_STATUTE